Wyoming, session 2026, SF0019.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 21-4-310(c)(iii), 21-4-316(a),
(b)(intro), (c)(i) through (iii), (vii), (viii),
(d)(intro), (ii), (e)(i), (ii), (iv) and (v), 33-24-158(b),
35-4-902(a)(viii), 35-4-903(a)(intro), (b)(intro) and (ii),
35-4-904(a), (b)(intro) and (c), 35-4-905 and 35-4-906(a)
through (e) are amended to read:
21-4-310. Self-administration of medication for
potentially life threatening conditions.
(c) As used in this section:
(iii) "Medication required for potentially life
threatening conditions" includes, but is not limited to
asthma medication and prescription single dose epinephrine.
pens.
21-4-316. Administration of stock epinephrine.
(a) A district board may adopt and implement a policy
whereby the district may acquire, maintain and dispense to
schools within the district a supply of epinephrine.
auto-injectors. Upon authorization by the board, school
nurses and assigned school personnel may administer a stock
epinephrine auto-injector to a student that the school
nurse or assigned school personnel in good faith believes
is experiencing a severe allergic reaction. A district
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0019
ENROLLED ACT NO. 20, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
board shall not be required to obtain a prescription to
acquire, maintain or dispense to schools within the
district a supply of epinephrine auto-injectors under this
section. A district board may enter into arrangements with
manufacturers or third-party suppliers of epinephrine
auto-injectors to obtain the epinephrine auto-injectors at
fair market, free or reduced prices.
(b) A district board that decides to acquire,
maintain and dispense a supply of epinephrine
auto-injectors shall:
(c) Not later than December 31, 2014, The department
of education, in consultation with the department of
health, shall develop and make available to all schools
guidelines for the management of students with life
threatening allergies. The guidelines shall include, but
not be limited to:
(i) Identification of life threatening allergies
or severe allergic reactions qualifying for the
administration of epinephrine auto-injectors under this
act;
(ii) Identification of appropriate and
acceptable epinephrine auto-injectors administration
devices or methods;
(iii) Education and training for school
personnel on the management of students with life
threatening allergies, including training related to the
administration of epinephrine; auto-injectors;
(vii) Requirements for each school to keep a
record of each incident that involves a life threatening
2

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0019
ENROLLED ACT NO. 20, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
allergy or the administration of stock epinephrine;
auto-injectors;
(viii) Requirements for schools that have
adopted a policy allowing for the administration of stock
epinephrine auto-injectors pursuant to this section to
maintain a list of employees in the school or school
district who have been trained and assigned to administer
stock epinephrine; auto-injectors;
(d) A school that possesses and makes available stock
epinephrine auto-injectors and those persons specified in
this subsection shall not be liable for damages for any
injuries that result from the administration of,
self-administration of, or failure to administer
epinephrine auto-injectors that may constitute ordinary
negligence. This immunity applies regardless of whether
authorization was provided by the student's parent or
guardian or by the student's health care provider. This
immunity does not apply to acts or omissions constituting
gross, willful or wanton negligence. The administration of
stock epinephrine auto-injectors in accordance with this
section is not the practice of medicine. The immunity from
liability provided under this section is in addition to and
not in lieu of that provided under W.S. 1-1-120. The
immunity provided in this subsection extends to:
(ii) An authorized health care provider who
prescribes stock epinephrine; auto-injectors; and
(e) As used in this section:
(i) "Administer" or "administration" means the
direct application of a stock epinephrine; auto-injector;
3

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0019
ENROLLED ACT NO. 20, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(ii) "Assigned school personnel" means an
employee, agent or volunteer of a school designated by the
administrator of the school who has completed the training
required under this section to provide or administer stock
epinephrine; auto-injectors;
(iv) "Provide" means the supply of one (1) or
more stock epinephrine auto-injectors doses;
(v) "Stock epinephrine" means injectable
medications used for the treatment of severe,
life-threatening allergies that schools or districts buy
and keep on-site for emergency use.
33-24-158. Prescription of epinephrine or opiate
antagonist by pharmacist.
(b) The board, in cooperation with the Wyoming state
board of medicine, shall adopt rules specifying the
requirements a pharmacist shall meet in order to prescribe
an epinephrine auto-injector or an opiate antagonist.
35-4-902. Definitions.
(a) As used in this article:
(viii) "Epinephrine" auto-injector" means an
automatic injectable a device or method that administers
the drug epinephrine to a person experiencing anaphylaxis
and includes epipens, nasal sprays or any other device or
method under a different brand name used for emergency
epinephrine delivery for the treatment of anaphylaxis and
which device or method is approved by the United States
food and drug administration.
4

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0019
ENROLLED ACT NO. 20, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
35-4-903. Prescription of epinephrine or opiate
antagonist.
(a) A practitioner or a pharmacist acting in good
faith and exercising reasonable care may, without a
prescriber-patient relationship, prescribe an epinephrine
auto-injector or an opiate antagonist to:
(b) A practitioner or pharmacist who prescribes an
epinephrine auto-injector or an opiate antagonist under
this article shall provide education to the person to whom
the epinephrine auto-injector or opiate antagonist is
prescribed, which shall include written instruction on how
to:
(ii) Respond appropriately to an anaphylaxis or
opiate related drug overdose event, including how to
administer epinephrine through use of an epinephrine
auto-injector or administer an opiate antagonist;
35-4-904. Standing order for epinephrine or opiate
antagonist; anaphylaxis and drug overdose treatment policy;
rules.
(a) A practitioner acting in good faith and
exercising reasonable care may prescribe by a standing
order an epinephrine auto-injector or an opiate antagonist
to an entity that, in the course of the entity's official
duties or business, may be in a position to assist a person
experiencing anaphylaxis or an opiate related drug
overdose.
(b) An entity prescribed an epinephrine auto-injector
or an opiate antagonist by standing order shall establish
an anaphylaxis or a drug overdose treatment policy in
5

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0019
ENROLLED ACT NO. 20, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
accordance with rules adopted by the department of health.
The anaphylaxis or drug overdose treatment policy shall:
(c) The Wyoming state board of medicine and the
Wyoming state board of nursing may adopt rules as necessary
to implement and administer a prescription of an
epinephrine auto-injector or an opiate antagonist by a
standing order.
35-4-905. Voluntary participation.
This article does not establish a duty or standard of care
for a person to prescribe or administer epinephrine,
through use of an epinephrine auto-injector, or an opiate
antagonist.
35-4-906. Administration of epinephrine or opiate
antagonist; immunity from liability; exemption from
unprofessional conduct; relation to other law.
(a) A person acting in good faith may administer
epinephrine through use of an epinephrine auto-injector or
an opiate antagonist to another person who appears to be
experiencing anaphylaxis or an opiate related drug
overdose.
(b) A person who administers epinephrine through use
of an epinephrine auto-injector or an opiate antagonist
pursuant to this article is personally immune from civil or
criminal liability for any act or omission resulting in
damage or injury.
(c) A practitioner or pharmacist who prescribes an
epinephrine auto-injector or an opiate antagonist pursuant
to this article is personally immune from civil or criminal
6

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0019
ENROLLED ACT NO. 20, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
liability for any act or omission resulting in damage or
injury.
(d) An entity that establishes an anaphylaxis or drug
overdose treatment policy pursuant to this article is
immune from civil or criminal liability for any act or
omission related to the administration of epinephrine
through use of an epinephrine auto-injector or an opiate
antagonist resulting in damage or injury.
(e) Prescribing an epinephrine auto-injector or an
opiate antagonist by a practitioner or pharmacist pursuant
to this article shall not constitute unprofessional
conduct.
Section 2. The department of education, the
department of health and the board of pharmacy shall
promulgate all rules necessary to implement this act.
7

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0019
ENROLLED ACT NO. 20, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 3.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2026.
(b) Sections 2 and 3 of this section are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
8